Missouri, session 2026, SB1423.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 334.031, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 334.031,
to read as follows:
334.031. 1. Candidates for licenses as physicians and
surgeons shall furnish [satisfactory evidence of their good
moral character, and their preliminary qualifications, to
wit: a certificate of graduation from an accredited high
school or its equivalent, and satisfactory evidence of
completion of preprofessional education consisting of a
minimum of sixty semester hours of college credits in
acceptable subjects leading towards the degree of bachelor
of arts or bachelor of science from an accredited college or
university. They shall also furnish satisfactory evidence
of having attended throughout at least four terms of thirty-
two weeks of actual instructions in each term and of having
received a diploma from some reputable medical college or
osteopathic college that enforces requirements of four terms
of thirty-two weeks for actual instruction in each term,
including, in addition to class work, such experience in
operative and hospital work during the last two years of
instruction as is required by the American Medical
Association and the American Osteopathic Association before
the college is approved and accredited as reputable. Any
medical college approved and accredited as reputable by the
1

American Medical Association or the Liaison Committee on
Medical Education and any osteopathic college approved and
accredited as reputable by the American Osteopathic
Association is deemed to have complied with the requirements
of this subsection]:
(a) Evidence of good moral character by submitting to
a criminal background check as provided in section 43.540;
(b) Either:
a. A diploma and academic transcripts from a school
accredited by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education,
the Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation, or a
similar accrediting agency or from some reputable medical
college or osteopathic college; or
b. A valid certificate from the Educational Commission
for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG); and
(c) A certificate demonstrating that the applicant has
satisfied the requirements of section 334.035 relating to
postgraduate training. An applicant who holds a valid
certificate issued by the ECFMG shall submit satisfactory
evidence of successful completion of two years of such
training.
(2) Except as provided in subsection 3 of this
section, the board shall not require applicants to provide
information in addition to the information the applicant is
required to furnish under this subsection.
2. In determining the qualifications necessary for
licensure as a qualified physician and surgeon, the board,
by rule and regulation, may accept the certificate of the
National Board of Medical Examiners of the United States,
chartered pursuant to the laws of the District of Columbia,
of the National Board of Examiners for Osteopathic
Physicians and Surgeons chartered pursuant to the laws of
the state of Indiana, or of the Licentiate of the Medical
2

Counsel of Canada (LMCC) in lieu of and as equivalent to its
own professional examination. Every applicant for a license
on the basis of such certificate, upon making application
showing necessary qualifications as provided in subsection 1
of this section, shall be required to pay the same fee
required of applicants to take the examination before the
board.
3. The board may require applicants to list all
licenses to practice as a physician currently or previously
held in any other state, territory, or country and to
disclose any past or pending investigations, discipline, or
sanctions against each such license.
4. In addition to the criminal background screening
required by this section, the board may obtain a report on
the applicant from the National Practitioner Data Bank or
the Federation of State Medical Boards.
3